src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-pieaqkhkh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieʹǩǩ 1E-stem: # Noun '' - full paradigm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: pieʹǩˈǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: peâkˈka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: pieʹǩǩest
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess: pieʹǩˈǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Par: pieʹǩˈǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [pieʹǩǩtaa, pieʹǩǩtää]
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: pieʹǩǩ
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: pieʹǩǩi
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: pieʹǩǩid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: pieʹǩǩin
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: pieʹǩǩivuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [pieʹǩǩitaa, pieʹǩǩitää]
###
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: peâkˈkam
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: peâkˈkad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: pieʹǩˈǩes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩem
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: pieʹǩˈǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: pieʹǩˈǩez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: peâkˈkan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: peâkkad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: pieʹǩǩes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: pieʹǩǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: pieʹǩǩez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: peâkˈkan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: peâkkad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: pieʹǩǩes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: pieʹǩǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: pieʹǩǩez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: peâkˈksan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: peâkˈksad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: peâkˈkses
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: peâkˈkseen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: peâkˈkseed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: peâkˈkseez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: pieˈʹǩstan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: pieˈʹǩstad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: pieˈʹǩstes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: pieˈʹǩsteen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: pieˈʹǩsteed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: pieˈʹǩsteez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩinan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩinad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩines
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩineen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩineed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩineez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: peâkˈkantää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: peâkkadtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: pieʹǩǩestää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩentää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: pieʹǩǩedtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: pieʹǩǩeztää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg1: pieʹǩˈǩnan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg2: pieʹǩˈǩnad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxSg3: pieʹǩˈǩnes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩneen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl2: pieʹǩˈǩneed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Ess+PxPl3: pieʹǩˈǩneez
#
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: peâkˈkan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: peâkkad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: pieʹǩǩes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: pieʹǩˈǩen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: pieʹǩǩed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: pieʹǩǩez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩinan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩinad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩines
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩineen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩineed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩineez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩäänvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩäädvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩeesvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩeenvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩeedvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩeezvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: piõʹǩǩääntää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: piõʹǩǩäädtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: piõʹǩǩeestää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: piõʹǩǩeentää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: piõʹǩǩeedtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: piõʹǩǩeeztää
#
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: peâkkaž
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: peâkka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: peâkka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: peâkkže
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: peâkkast
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: peâkkain
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [peâkkataa, peâkkatää]
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: peâkkžen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: peâkkžed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: peâkka
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: peâkkai
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: peâkkaid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: peâkkaid
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: peâkkain
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: peâkkaivuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [peâkkaitaa, peâkkaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: peâkkžam
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: peâkkžad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: peâkkžes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: peâkkžeem
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: peâkkžeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: peâkkžeez
     
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: peâkkžan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: peâkkžad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: peâkkžes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: peâkkžeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: peâkkžeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: peâkkžeez
     
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: peâkkžan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: peâkkžad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: peâkkžes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: peâkkžeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: peâkkžeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: peâkkžeez

     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: peâkkžasan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: peâkkžasad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: peâkkžasas
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: peâkkžeʹsen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: peâkkžeʹsed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: peâkkžeʹsez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: peâˈkstan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: peâˈkstad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: peâˈkstes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: peâˈksteen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: peâˈksteed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: peâˈksteez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: peâkkainan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: peâkkainad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: peâkkaines
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: peâkkaineen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: peâkkaineed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: peâkkaineez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: peâkkžantää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: peâkkžadtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: peâkkžestää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: peâkkžeentää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: peâkkžeedtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: peâkkžeeztää

#     
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: peâkkžan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: peâkkžad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: peâkkžes
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: peâkkžeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: peâkkžeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: peâkkžeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: peâkkään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: peâkkääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: peâkkees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: peâkkeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: peâkkeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: peâkkeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: peâkkään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: peâkkääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: peâkkees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: peâkkeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: peâkkeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: peâkkeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: peâkkään
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: peâkkääd
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: peâkkees
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: peâkkeen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: peâkkeed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: peâkkeez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: peâkkainan
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: peâkkainad
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: peâkkaines
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: peâkkaineen
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: peâkkaineed
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: peâkkaineez
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: peâkkäänvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: peâkkäädvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: peâkkeesvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: peâkkeenvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: peâkkeedvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: peâkkeezvuiʹm
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: peâkkääntää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: peâkkäädtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: peâkkeestää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: peâkkeentää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: peâkkeedtää
     pieʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: peâkkeeztää
